Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1093.
do enact as follows:AB1093,13Section 1. 19.45 (8m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1093,2,3119.45 (8m) No individual who serves as a member of the legislature, for 12 2months following the date on which the individual ceases to hold office, may be 3employed as a lobbyist, as defined in s. 13.62 (11).AB1093,2,44